Idaho, session 2025, S1133.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 67-9704, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
67-9704. AGRICULTURAL PROTECTION AREAS. (1) No later than January 1,
2025, each Each board of county commissioners shall establish an agricul-
tural protection area ordinance in accordance with the notice and hearing
procedures in section 67-6509, Idaho Code. At a minimum, the ordinance
shall:
(a) Establish a process through which agricultural lands may be placed
in agricultural protection areas for a minimum of twenty (20) years;
(b) Establish the application requirements, including but not lim-
ited to information about the landowner; a description of the parcels,
structures, and facilities proposed to be included in an agricultural
protection area; and the current uses of lands proposed to be included
in an agricultural protection area;
(c) Establish clear and objective standards for evaluating applica-
tions for inclusion in an agricultural protection area;
(d) Establish the timeline for reviewing and making decisions on agri-
cultural protection area applications; and
(e) Establish an application fee to cover the not to exceed the cost of
covering administrative costs of expenses for processing applications,
including but not limited to reviewing application materials, holding
public meetings and hearings, providing public notice, recording ap-
plicable documents, and creating or updating county land use maps,
provided that such fee shall not exceed the actual costs of processing
the application a map of agricultural protection areas. Additional
fees may be required if an appeal is filed pursuant to section 67-9706,
Idaho Code, provided that such additional fees shall not exceed the ac-
tual cost of holding a public hearing.


(2) No later than January 1, 2025, each Each board of county commission-
ers shall establish by resolution or ordinance an agricultural protection
area commission pursuant to section 67-9705, Idaho Code.
(3) Agricultural protection areas shall be designated on future land
use planning maps a planning map to serve as a voluntary and expeditious tool
for working landowners while also informing to inform planners, commis-
sions, county officials, and citizens at large on how to proactively plan for
agriculture. Such map designation shall not require a rezone, comprehensive
plan amendment, or amendments to other comprehensive planning maps.
(4) The designations of specific parcels of land as agricultural pro-
tection areas shall not impact other parcels of land not designated as agri-
cultural protection areas.
(5) Nothing shall restrict an applicant, as defined in section 67-9703,
Idaho Code, from being able to apply for agricultural protection areas in-
side or outside of an area of impact established pursuant to section 67-6526,
Idaho Code.
(6) Agricultural protection areas shall not be changed to another land
use designation unless:
(a) The agricultural protection area expires and the landowner chooses
not to renew the agricultural protection area's designation; or
(b) The landowner chooses to remove land from an agricultural protec-
tion area pursuant to section 67-9709, Idaho Code.
SECTION 2. That Section 67-9706, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 3. That Chapter 97, Title 67, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 67-9706, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
67-9706. REVIEW AND ACTION ON AGRICULTURAL PROTECTION AREA APPLICA-
TION. (1) Within sixty (60) days of receiving a recommendation from the agri-
cultural protection area commission to support or reject an application, the
planning and zoning administrator or other administrative officer appointed
by the board of county commissioners shall approve or deny the application to
include land in an agricultural protection area in a written decision.
(2) The decision shall specify, at minimum:
(a) The ordinance and standards used in evaluating the application;
(b) The agricultural protection area commission's recommendation;
(c) A reasoned explanation for the decision reached by the administra-
tor or other administrative officer, if appointed; and
(d) If applicable, the actions, if any, that the applicant could take to
obtain approval.
(3) If the administrator or other administrative officer, if ap-
pointed, fails to issue a written decision within sixty (60) days of receiv-
ing a recommendation from the agricultural protection area commission, the
recommendation of the agricultural protection area commission shall become
the decision of the administrator or other administrative officer, if ap-
pointed.
(4)(a) An aggrieved applicant may appeal the decision to the board of
county commissioners within thirty (30) days of receiving the written


decision pursuant to subsection (1) of this section or recommendation
that has become final pursuant to subsection (3) of this section.
(b) Within sixty (60) days of receiving an appeal, the board of county
commissioners shall hold a public hearing in accordance with the notice
and hearing procedures described in section 67-6509, Idaho Code, re-
garding the appeal.
(c) In reviewing an appeal, the board of county commissioners shall
consider the recommendation of the agricultural protection area com-
mission, the written decision of the administrator or other admin-
istrative officer, if appointed, all written and oral public comment
received at the public hearing, and any other information the board of
county commissioners determines to be relevant.
(d) Within sixty (60) days of the close of the public hearing, the
board of county commissioners shall issue a final decision approving
or denying the agricultural protection area application. If the board
of county commissioners fails to act within the sixty (60) day period,
the decision of the administrator or other administrative officer, if
appointed, shall become the final decision of the board of county com-
missioners.
(5) The board of county commissioners' final decision shall be subject
to judicial review.
(6) If the agricultural protection area application is approved, the
agricultural protection area shall be created.
SECTION 4. That Section 67-9709, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
67-9709. ADDING LAND TO AND REMOVING LAND FROM AN AGRICULTURAL PRO-
TECTION AREA. (1) A landowner may add land to an existing agricultural pro-
tection area by filing an application with the board of county commission-
ers. The board of county commissioners shall review an application to add
land to an existing agricultural protection area in accordance with section
67-9706, Idaho Code.
(2) An owner of land within an agricultural protection area may remove
any or all of the land from the agricultural protection area by filing a peti-
tion for removal with the board of county commissioners.
(a) The board of county commissioners shall acknowledge receipt of the
petition for removal in writing; and
(b) Confirm the removal date as ten (10) years from the date of peti-
tion for removal, or upon expiration of the designation, whichever is
sooner.
(3) The board of county commissioners shall establish a process by
which an owner of land within an agricultural protection area may remove
any or all of the land from the agricultural protection area for reasons of
hardship, as defined in this chapter.
(4) The board of county commissioners may charge an administrative fee
to cover not to exceed the cost of covering administrative costs expenses
associated with processing changes to an agricultural protection area, in-
cluding but not limited to updating land use maps the agricultural protec-
tion area map, recording documents, and reasonable staff time for process-
ing the request, provided that such administrative fee shall not exceed the


actual cost of processing changes to an agricultural protection area. The
clerk of the board of county commissioners shall record the renewal of an
agricultural protection area pursuant to section 67-9708, Idaho Code.
SECTION 5. That Section 67-9710, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
67-9710. LIMITATIONS ON LOCAL REGULATIONS. (1) A board of county com-
missioners having created an agricultural protection area shall encourage
the continuity, development, and viability of agricultural use within the
specific boundaries designated in the agricultural protection area by not
enacting a local law, ordinance, or regulation that would restrict a farm
structure or farming practice within the boundaries of the agricultural pro-
tection area, unless such farm structure or farming practice does not comply
with generally recognized farming practices or the farm structure or land
use is in conflict with the current agricultural land use classification or
agricultural zoning designation of the area.
(2) The board of county commissioners shall not change the current
agricultural land use classification or agricultural zoning designation
for parcels of land within an agricultural protection area without written
permission from the landowner.
(3) The board of county commissioners shall amend applicable land use
planning maps to reflect the boundaries of designated agricultural protec-
tion areas and their benefits as provided in sections 67-9711 and 67-9712,
Idaho Code, and shall comply with the provisions of section 67-6508, Idaho
Code.
(4) (3) Nothing in this section shall prevent a board of county com-
missioners from regulating the siting of large confined animal feeding op-
erations and facilities pursuant to section 67-6529, Idaho Code; the sit-
ing of residential, commercial, manufacturing, industrial, solar energy, or
wind energy structures; or other nonagricultural land uses on lands included
within an agricultural protection area.
(4) The siting of residential, commercial, manufacturing, industrial,
solar or wind energy structures, or any other non-agricultural land use on
lands included within an agricultural protection area shall be prohibited
unless such uses are also contributing to agricultural production. Such
non-agricultural uses are subject to applicable county planning and zoning
ordinances and building codes.
SECTION 6. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after its
passage and approval.